Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3730
Tourism promotional products; contracts and agreements authorized.

The commission is authorized to develop and make available for sale directly to the public tourism promotional products related to state marketing campaigns developed and approved by the commission. The commission may contract with private vendors to produce, sell, and distribute such tourism promotional products or enter into agreements directly with retailers as provided in section 81-3728. Any revenue from the sale of such tourism promotional products shall be credited to the Nebraska Tourism Commission Promotional Cash Fund as provided in section 81-3728.

Laws 2019, LB637, § 3;

Laws 2022, LB59, § 3.